Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Natural History Museum

146.650.
Legislative findings regarding state’s natural history — Purposes of KRS 146.650 to 146.666. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

146.652.
Kentucky Natural History Museum — Board of directors — Appointments, terms, and meetings. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2015 ch. 69, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

146.654.
Powers and duties of board. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 18, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 15, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

146.656.
Director to administer museum — Qualifications. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

146.658.
Duties of director. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

146.660.
Administrative mission units of museum — Associate directors. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

146.662.
Curation and science unit — Functions — Qualifications of associate director. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

146.664.
Education and events unit — Functions — Qualifications of associate director. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

146.666.
Exhibits and maintenance unit — Functions — Qualifications of associate director. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 329, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.